zh-TW: 軟質木材等級: C 選; 建築木材; D 選; 1 級; 2 級; 3 級; 其他
el: Ποιότητα ξυλείας από μαλακό ξύλο: Γ επιλέξτε; Βαθμός κατασκευής; Δ επιλέξτε; Νο 1; Νο 2; Νο. 3; Άλλο
it: Classificazione del legno di conifera: Selezione C; Grado di costruzione; Selezione D; N. 1; N. 2; N. 3; Altro
en: Softwood lumber grade: C select; Construction grade; D select; No. 1; No. 2; No. 3; Other
tr: Yumuşak ağaç kereste sınıfı: C seçimi; İnşaat sınıfı; D seçimi; No. 1; No. 2; No. 3; Diğer
sk-SK: Trieda reziva z mäkkého dreva: Výber C; Stavebný stupeň; Výber D; č. 1; č. 2; č. 3; Iné
bg-BG: Клас дървен материал от иглолистна дървесина: C select; Клас на конструкцията; D select; № 1; № 2; № 3; Други
zh-CN: 软木木材等级: C 选择级; 建筑等级; D 选择级; 1号; 2号; 3号; 其他
de: Weichholzqualität: C-Auswahl; Bauholz; D-Auswahl; Nr. 1; Nr. 2; Nr. 3; Sonstiges
da: Blødt træ tømmerkvalitet: C-valg; Byggegrad; D-valg; Nr. 1; Nr. 2; Nr. 3; Andet
fr: Qualité du bois d’œuvre résineux: C sélectionner; Qualité de la construction; D sélectionner; N° 1; N° 2; N° 3; Autre
sv: Barrträvirkeskvalitet: C select; Byggklass; D select; Nr 1; Nr 2; Nr 3; Övrigt
lt-LT: Spygliuočių medienos klasė: „C Select“; Statybinė; „D Select“; Nr. 1; Nr. 2; Nr. 3; Kita
ja: 針葉樹材のグレード: Cセレクト; 建築グレード; Dセレクト; No.1; No.2; No.3; その他
th: เกรดไม้อัดเนื้ออ่อน: เกรด C คัดพิเศษ; เกรดสำหรับการก่อสร้าง; เกรด D คัดพิเศษ; เบอร์ 1; เบอร์ 2; เบอร์ 3; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Ocjena mekog drva: C select; Građevinski stupanj; C select; Br. 1; Br. 2; Br. 3; Ostalo
es: Grado de madera blanda: Selección C; Grado de construcción; Selección D; N.º 1; N.º 2; N.º 3; Otros
ru: Сорт пиломатериалов хвойных пород: Выбор C; Конструкционный сорт; Выбор D; № 1; № 2; № 3; Другое
sl-SI: Vrsta mehkega lesa: C izbrano; Gradbeni razred; D izbrano; Št. 1; Št. 2; Št. 3; Drugo
vi: Phân loại gỗ mềm: Hạng C select; Cấp xây dựng; Hạng D select; Số 1; Số 2; Số 3; Khác
hu: Fenyőfűrészáru: C válogatott; Építési fokozat; D válogatott; 1. számú; 2. számú; 3. számú; Egyéb
ko: 연목재 등급: C선택; 건축 등급; D선택; 1등급; 2등급; 3등급; 기타
pt-BR: Classe de madeira resinosa: Seleção C; Grau de construção; Seleção D; Nº 1; Nº 2; Nº 3; Outro
nb: Bartrekvalitet: C-valg; Byggekarakter; D-valg; Nr. 1; Nr. 2; Nr. 3; Annet
nl: Kwaliteitnaaldtimmerhout: C select; Bouwkwaliteit; D select; No. 1; No. 2; No. 3; Andere
pl: Gatunek drewna iglastego: C select; Kategoria konstrukcyjna; D select; Nr 1; Nr 2; Nr 3; Inne
ro-RO: Clasă cherestea din lemn de esență moale: C select; Grad de construcție; D select; Nr. 1; Nr. 2; Nr. 3; Altele
fi: Havupuun sahatavaraluokka: C-valikoima; Rakennusluokka; D-valikoima; Nro 1; Nro 2; Nro 3; Muu
pt-PT: Classe de madeira macia: Seleção C; Classe de construção; Seleção D; N.º 1; N.º 2; N.º 3; Outro
cs: Třída řeziva z měkkého dřeva: C – výběr; Stavební třída; D – výběr; Č. 1; Č. 2; Č. 3; Jiné